Utah statutes.
53A-19-103.   Undistributed reserve in school board budget.
(1)  A local school board may adopt a budget with an undistributed reserve.
The reserve may not exceed 5% of the maintenance and operation budget adopted
by the board in accordance with a scale developed by the State Board of
Education.  The scale is based on the size of the school district's budget.
(2)  The board may appropriate all or a part of the undistributed reserve made
to any expenditure classification in the maintenance and operation budget by
written resolution adopted by a majority vote of the board setting forth the
reasons for the appropriation.  The board shall file a copy of the resolution
with the State Board of Education and the state auditor.
(3)  The board may not use undistributed reserves in the negotiation or
settlement of contract salaries for school district employees.
